New Jersey, session 222, A3320.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    As used in this act: Animal care facility means any: (1) kennel, pet shop, shelter, or pound licensed pursuant to section 8 of P.L.1941, c.151 (C.4:19-15.8); (2) grooming business or establishment offering grooming services for dogs, cats, or other domestic animals; or (3) dog daycare, kennel, or other commercial establishment that boards, houses, or provides day care services for dogs or other domestic pets. Video monitoring system means a system of video cameras that continuously records activity in covered areas and stores footage for a minimum of 30 days. 2.    a.  Each animal care facility operating in the State shall install and maintain a functioning video monitoring system. b.  Cameras shall be placed in areas where animals are kept, groomed, or otherwise handled by staff, but shall not be required in employee break rooms, restrooms, or administrative offices. c.  The owner or operator of an animal care facility shall retain video recordings for at least 30 days and make them available upon request to any State department or law enforcement agency investigating an alleged violation of State law concerning animal cruelty, consumer fraud, or other applicable laws. 3.    a.  The Department of Agriculture, in consultation with the Division of Consumer Affairs, shall adopt rules and regulations pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.) to implement and enforce this act. b.  A facility found to be in violation of this act shall be subject to a civil penalty of up to $500 for a first offense and up to $1,000 for each subsequent offense, to be collected in a summary proceeding pursuant to the Penalty Enforcement Law of 1999, P.L.1999, c.274 (C.2A:58-10 et seq.).  The Superior Court and the municipal court shall have jurisdiction to enforce the Penalty Enforcement Law of 1999 in connection with this act..  Each day of violation shall constitute an additional, separate, and distinct offense. 4.    This act shall take effect immediately.